New Jersey, session 222, A2636.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the Madison Holleran Proper Reporting Act. 2.    Beginning with the 2019-2020 academic year, an institution of higher education shall provide for public inspection on its website information concerning the total number of students enrolled in the institution who committed suicide or attempted suicide in the prior academic year.  The institution shall update the information annually. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.